District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-3716

Civil penalties.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-216, § 17, 40 DCR 37
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(b)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2646.